nl: Zakelijk en industrieel: Reclame en marketing; Agrarische sector; Componenten voor automatische bediening; Bouw; Tandheelkunde; Film en televisie; Financiën en verzekeringen; Catering en horeca; Bosbouw en houthakken; Haar- en schoonheidsverzorging; Zwaar materieel; Hotel en accommodatie; Industriële opslag; Accessoires voor industriële opslag; Schoonmaakkarren en -wagens; Wetshandhaving; Productie; Materiaalbehandeling; Medisch; Mijnbouw en steengroeven; Piercing en tatoeages; Retail; Wetenschap en laboratoriums; Gevel- en uitgangborden; Beschermende kleding
hu: Üzlet és ipar: Reklámozás és marketing; Mezőgazdaság; Automatizálási vezérlőkomponensek; Építés; Fogászat; Film és televízió; Pénzügy és biztosítás; Ételkiszolgálás; Erdészet és fakitermelés; Fodrászat és kozmetológia; Nehézgépek; Szálloda és vendéglátás; Ipari raktározás; Ipari tárolási tartozékok; Takarítókocsik és -tartók; Törvényvégrehajtás; Gyártás; Anyagkezelés; Orvosi; Bányászat és kőfejtés; Piercing és tetoválás; Kiskereskedelem; Tudomány és laboratórium; Jelzések; Munkavédelmi védőfelszerelés
zh-CN: 商业/工业: 广告与营销; 农/畜牧/渔业专用设备; 自动化控制组件; 建筑用品; 牙科; 影视; 金融与保险; 餐饮服务; 林业与伐木业; 美容美发业; 重型机械; 酒店与宾馆; 工业仓储; 工业仓储配件; 清洁车/杂物篮; 执法; 制造业; 材料处理; 医疗; 采矿与采石; 穿刺与纹身; 零售业; 科学与实验; 标识牌; 劳保/防护用品
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial: Publicidade e marketing; Agricultura; Componentes de controle de automação; Construção; Odontologia; Filmes e televisão; Finanças e seguros; Serviço de gastronomia; Silvicultura e corte de madeira; Cabeleireiros e Cosmetologia; Maquinaria pesada; Hotel e hospitalidade; Armazenamento industrial; Acessórios para armazenamento industrial; Carrinhos e baldes para limpeza; Aplicação das leis; Manufatura; Manuseio de materiais; Medicina; Mineração; Piercing e tatuagem; Varejo; Ciência e laboratório; Sinalização; Equipamento de proteção
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus: Mainostus ja markkinointi; Maatalous; Automaatio-ohjauksen komponentit; Rakennustyöt; Hammashoito; Elokuva ja televisio; Talous ja vakuutus; Ruokapalvelu; Metsänhoito ja hakkuut; Kampaamo ja kosmetologia; Raskaskalusto; Hotelli ja majoitus; Teollinen säilytys; Varastokaappien lisätarvikkeet; Siivousvaunut ja -kärryt; Viranomaistyö; Tuotanto; Materiaalien käsittely; Lääketiede; Kaivos ja louhinta; Lävistykset ja tatuointi; Jälleenmyynti; Tiede ja laboratorio; Viitat; Työturvallisuusvälineet
pl: Biznes i przemysł: Reklama i marketing; Rolnictwo; Komponenty automatyki przemysłowej; Budownictwo; Stomatologia; Film i telewizja; Finanse i ubezpieczenia; Usługi gastronomiczne; Leśnictwo i pozyskiwanie drewna; Fryzjerstwo i kosmetologia; Ciężki sprzęt; Hotelarstwo; Magazynowanie; Akcesoria magazynowe; Wózki do sprzątania; Organy ścigania; Produkcja; Transport materiałów; Branża medyczna; Górnictwo głębinowe i odkrywkowe; Piercing i tatuaże; Sprzedaż detaliczna; Badania naukowe i laboratoryjne; Informacja wizualna; Środki ochrony osobistej
hr-HR: Posao i industrija: Oglašavanje i marketing; Poljoprivreda; Komponente upravljanja automatizacijom; Izgradnja; Stomatologija; Film i televizija; Financije i osiguranje; Usluga prehrane; Šumarstvo i sječa; Uređivanje kose i kozmetika; Radni strojevi; Hotelijerstvo i ugostiteljstvo; Industrijsko skladištenje; Pribor za industrijsko skladištenje; Kolica za domara; Provedba zakona; Proizvodnja; Rukovanje materijalom; Medicina; Rudarstvo i vađenje kamena; Piercing i tetoviranje; Maloprodaja; Znanost i laboratorij; Signalizacija; Zaštitna oprema za rad
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė: Reklama ir rinkodara; Žemės ūkis; Automatikos valdymo komponentai; Statyba; Odontologija; Kinas ir televizija; Finansai ir draudimas; Maitinimo paslaugos; Miškininkystė ir medienos ruoša; Plaukų kirpimas ir kosmetologija; Sunkioji technika; Viešbučiai, apgyvendinimo ir maitinimo paslaugų sektorius; Pramoninis sandėliavimas; Pramoniniai sandėliavimo priedai; Valytojų vežimėliai ir daiktų dėklai ant ratukų; Teisėsauga; Gamyba; Medžiagų tvarkymas; Medicina; Kasyba ir akmenskaldyba; Auskarų vėrimas ir tatuiruotės; Mažmeninė prekyba; Mokslas ir laboratorijos; Ženklinimas; Darbo saugos priemonės
zh-TW: 商業與各產業: 廣告和行銷; 農業; 自動化控制元件; 營造建設; 牙科; 電影和電視; 金融與保險; 餐飲服務; 林業伐木; 美髮美容; 重型機具; 飯店與餐飲; 工業倉儲; 貨倉架配件; 清潔推車; 執法; 製造業; 物料處理; 醫療業; 採礦和採石業; 人體穿孔和刺青; 零售; 科學和實驗室; 廣告牌; 工作安全防護裝備
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel: Reklama a marketing; Poľnohospodárstvo; Komponenty riadenia automatizácie; Stavebníctvo; Zubné lekárstvo; Film a televízia; Financie a poistenie; Stravovanie; Lesníctvo a ťažba dreva; Kaderníctvo a kozmetika; Ťažké strojárenstvo; Hotelové a pohostinské služby; Priemyselné skladovanie; Príslušenstvo pre priemyselné skladovanie; Upratovacie vozíky a debny; Presadzovanie práva; Výroba; Manipulácia s materiálom; Zdravotníctvo; Hlbinná a povrchová ťažba; Piercing a tetovanie; Maloobchod; Vedecké laboratórium; Označenia; Pracovné ochranné prostriedky
ja: ビジネス・産業: 広告・マーケティング; 農業; 自動制御部品; 建築; 歯科; 映画・テレビ; 金融・保険; 飲食業; 林業・伐採; 理容・美容; 重機; ホテル・サービス業; 業務用ストレージ; 業務用ストレージ関連用品; 清掃カート/バケツ; 警察; 製造; 運搬; 医療; 鉱業・採石; ピアス・タトゥー; 小売; 科学・実験; 看板・標識; 安全保護用品
sl-SI: Posel in industrija: Oglaševanje in trženje; Kmetijstvo; Komponente za nadzor avtomatskih sistemov; Gradbeništvo; Zobozdravstvo; Film in televizija; Finance in zavarovanje; Prehranske storitve; Gozdarstvo in sečnja; Frizerstvo in kozmetika; Težka mehanizacija; Hoteli in gostinstvo; Industrijsko skladiščenje; Dodatki za industrijsko skladiščenje; Vozički in košarice za čiščenje; Policija; Proizvodnja; Manipuliranje z materialom; Zdravstvo; Rudarstvo in kamnoseštvo; Pirsing in tetoviranje; Trgovina; Znanost in laboratorij; Označevanje; Varnostna zaščitna oprema za delo
es: Economía e industria: Publicidad y márketing; Agricultura; Componentes de control de automatización; Construcción; Odontología; Cine y televisión; Finanzas y seguros; Restauración; Ingeniería forestal e industria maderera; Peluquería y cosmética; Maquinaria pesada; Hostelería y hospedaje; Almacenamiento industrial; Accesorios para almacenaje industrial; Carretones y caddies de mantenimiento; Mantenimiento del orden público; Fabricación; Manipulación de materiales; Productos médicos; Minería y explotación de canteras; Piercings y tatuajes; Venta al por menor; Ciencia y laboratorio; Avisos; Equipo de protección para el trabajo
en: Business & Industrial: Advertising & Marketing; Agriculture; Automation Control Components; Construction; Dentistry; Film & Television; Finance & Insurance; Food Service; Forestry & Logging; Hairdressing & Cosmetology; Heavy Machinery; Hotel & Hospitality; Industrial Storage; Industrial Storage Accessories; Janitorial Carts & Caddies; Law Enforcement; Manufacturing; Material Handling; Medical; Mining & Quarrying; Piercing & Tattooing; Retail; Science & Laboratory; Signage; Work Safety Protective Gear
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост: Реклама и маркетинг; Селско стопанство; Компоненти за автоматизирано управление; Строителство; Стоматология; Филми и телевизия; Финанси и застраховане; Обществено хранене; Горско стопанство и дърводобив; Фризьорство и козметология; Тежка техника; Хотелиерство и ресторантьорство; Системи за индустриално съхранение; Аксесоари за системи за индустриално съхранение; Почистващи колички и кошници; Правоприлагане; Производство; Товаро-разтоварни операции; Медицински; Миньорство и кариери; Пиърсинг и татуиране; Търговия; Наука и лаборатория; Указателни знаци; Защитна екипировка за безопасност при работа
ru: Бизнес и промышленность: Реклама и маркетинг; Сельское хозяйство; Компоненты автоматизированных систем управления; Строительство; Стоматология; Кино и телевидение; Финансы и страхование; Общественное питание; Лесоводство и лесозаготовки; Парикмахерское дело и косметология; Тяжелая техника; Гостинично-ресторанный бизнес; Системы хранения на производственных складах; Аксессуары для систем хранения на производственных складах; Тележки и корзины для уборки; Обеспечения правопорядка; Производство; Погрузо-разгрузочные операции; Медицина; Горное дело; Пирсинг и татуировка; Розничная торговля; Лабораторное и научное оборудование; Знаки и вывески; Защитная экипировка для безопасного выполнения работ
nb: Forretninger og industri: Annonsering og markedsføring; Jordbruk; Komponenter for automasjonskontroll; Byggevarer; Odontologi; Film og TV; Finans og forsikring; Matservice; Skogbruk og tømmer; Hårpleie og kosmetologi; Tunge maskiner; Hotell og reiseliv; Industriell lagring; Tilbehør til industriell lagring; Vaktmestervogner; Lovhåndhevelse; Produksjon; Materialhåndtering; Medisinsk; Gruvedrift og steinbrudd; Piercing og tatovering; Detaljhandel; Vitenskap og laboratorier; Skilting; Beskyttelsesutstyr for jobbsikkerhet
fr: Entreprise et industrie: Marketing et publicité; Agriculture; Composants d’automatisation; Construction; Médecine dentaire; Cinéma et télévision; Finance et assurance; Restauration; Foresterie et exploitation des forêts; Coiffure et cosmétologie; Machinerie lourde; Hôtel et service d’accueil; Stockage industriel; Accessoires de stockage industriel; Chariots d’entretien; Maintien de l’ordre public; Fabrication; Manipulation de matériel; Secteur médical; Exploitation des carrières et extraction; Tatouages et piercings; Commerce de détail; Sciences et laboratoire; Signalétique; Équipement de protection
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός: Διαφήμιση & Μάρκετινγκ; Γεωργία; Εξαρτήματα ελέγχου αυτοματισμού; Κατασκευές; Οδοντιατρική; Κινηματογράφος & τηλεόραση; Χρηματοοικονομικά & ασφάλειες; Υπηρεσία φαγητού; Δασοκομία & υλοτομία; Κομμωτική & κοσμητολογία; Βαρέα μηχανήματα; Ξενοδοχείο & φιλοξενία; Βιομηχανική αποθήκευση; Βιομηχανικά εξαρτήματα αποθήκευσης; Καρότσια & φορητοί δίσκοι καθαρισμού; Επιβολή του νόμου; Βιομηχανική παραγωγή; Χειρισμός υλικών; Ιατρικά είδη; Εξόρυξη & λατομεία; Piercing & τατουάζ; Λιανικό εμπόριο; Επιστήμη & εργαστήριο; Σήμανση; Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός εργασίας
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม: การโฆษณาและการตลาด; เกษตรกรรม; ส่วนประกอบควบคุมระบบอัตโนมัติ; การก่อสร้าง; ทันตกรรม; ฟิล์มและทีวี; การเงินและการประกันภัย; บริการอาหาร; ป่าไม้และการทำไม้; การทำผมและเสริมความงาม; เครื่องสำหรับอุตสาหกรรมหนัก; โรงแรมและการบริการ; การจัดเก็บเชิงอุตสาหกรรม; อุปกรณ์จัดเก็บเชิงอุตสาหกรรม; รถเข็นและกล่องทำความสะอาด; การบังคับใช้กฎหมาย; การผลิต; การขนถ่ายวัสดุ; การแพทย์; การทำเหมืองและเหมืองแร่; การเจาะและการสัก; การค้าปลีก; วิทยาศาสตร์และห้องแล็บ; ป้ายโฆษณา; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันสำหรับความปลอดภัยในการทำงาน
tr: İş ve Endüstri: Reklamcılık ve Pazarlama; Tarım; Otomasyon Denetim Bileşenleri; İnşaat; Diş Hekimliği; Film ve Televizyon; Finans ve Sigorta; Yemek Servisi; Ormancılık ve Kerestecilik; Saç Kesimi ve Kozmetoloji; Ağır İş Makineleri; Otel ve Ağırlama; Endüstriyel Depolama; Endüstriyel Depolama Aksesuarları; Temizlik Görevlisi Araçları ve Arabaları; Kolluk Kuvvetleri Ekipmanları; İmalat; Malzeme Taşıma; Medikal; Madencilik ve Taş Ocakçılığı; Piercing ve Dövme; Perakende; Bilim ve Laboratuvar; İşaret ve Tabelalar; İş Güvenliği Koruyucu Kıyafetleri
cs: Obchod a průmysl: Reklama a marketing; Zemědělství; Součásti pro automatické řízení; Stavebnictví; Stomatologie; Film a televize; Finance a pojišťovnictví; Cateringové služby; Lesnictví a těžba dřeva; Kadeřnictví a kosmetika; Těžká stavební technika; Hotely a ubytovací služby; Průmyslové skladování; Průmyslové skladování – příslušenství; Uklízecí vozíky; Bezpečnostní složky; Výroba; Manipulace s materiálem; Zdravotnictví; Těžba; Piercing a tetování; Prodejny; Věda a laboratoře; Značení; Ochranné pomůcky
da: Erhverv og industri: Reklame og marketing; Landbrug; Komponenter til automatiseringskontrol; Byggeri; Tandlæge; Film og tv; Finans og forsikring; Catering; Skovdrift og skovarbejde; Frisør og kosmetologi; Store maskiner; Hotel og overnatning; Opbevaring til industri; Tilbehør til industriel opbevaring; Rengøringsvogne og holdere til rengøringsudstyr; Politi; Produktion; Materialehåndtering; Medicinsk; Minedrift og stenbrud; Piercing og tatovering; Detail; Videnskab og laboratorier; Skiltning; Sikkerhedstøj
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie: Werbung & Marketing; Landwirtschaft; Automatisierungskomponenten; Baugewerbe; Zahnmedizin; Film & Fernsehen; Finanzwesen & Versicherung; Nahrungsmittelservice; Forst- & Holzwirtschaft; Friseur- & Kosmetikgewerbe; Schwermaschinen; Hotels & Gaststätten; Gewerbliche Lagerung; Aufbewahrungszubehör für industrielle Zwecke; Wagen für Reinigungskräfte; Strafverfolgung; Herstellung; Materialbeförderung; Medizinischer Bereich; Bergbau & Steinbruch; Piercing & Tätowieren; Einzelhandel; Wissenschaft & Labor; Beschilderung; Arbeitsschutzausrüstung
ko: 비즈니스/산업: 광고/마케팅; 농업; 자동 제어 기기; 건설; 치과; 영화/텔레비전; 금융/보험; 요식업; 임업/벌목; 헤어디자인/메이크업; 중공업; 호텔/숙박업; 산업용 보관시설; 산업용 보관시설 부대용품; 청소용 카트 및 캐디; 법 집행기관; 제조; 자재 관리; 의료; 채굴/채석; 피어싱/문신; 소매; 과학/연구; 신호; 작업용 안전 보호 장치
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial: Publicitate și marketing; Agricultură; Componente de control al automatizării; Construcții; Stomatologie; Film și televiziune; Finanțe și asigurări; Servicii alimentare; Silvicultură și exploatare forestieră; Coafat și cosmetică; Mașini grele; Hoteluri și sectorul ospitalității; Depozitare pentru sectorul industrial; Accesorii de depozitare pentru sectorul industrial; Cărucioare și cutii pentru curățenie; Aplicarea legii; Fabricare; Manipularea materialelor; Sectorul medical; Exploatare mine și cariere; Piercing și tatuaje; Retail; Știință și laborator; Semnalizare; Echipament de protecție pentru siguranța muncii
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp: Quảng cáo & Tiếp thị; Nông nghiệp; Linh kiện điều khiển tự động hóa; Xây dựng; Nha khoa; Phim ảnh và truyền hình; Tài chính & Bảo hiểm; Ngành thực phẩm; Lâm nghiệp & Khai thác gỗ; Làm tóc & thẩm mỹ; Cơ khí nặng; Khách sạn & Dịch vụ khách hàng; Cất giữ công nghiệp; Phụ kiện tủ chứa công nghiệp; Xe đẩy lau dọn chuyên nghiệp; Thực thi luật pháp; Sản xuất; Vận chuyển vật tư; Y tế; Khai mỏ và khai thác đá; Xuyên và xăm; Bán lẻ; Khoa học & Phòng thí nghiệm; Bảng chỉ dẫn; Bộ đồ bảo hộ lao động
pt-PT: Business e industrial: Publicidade e marketing; Agricultura; Componentes de controlo de automatização; Construção; Odontologia; Filme e televisão; Finanças e seguros; Serviço alimentar; Silvicultura e indústria madeireira; Cabeleireiro e cosmetologia; Maquinaria pesada; Hotel e hospitalidade; Armazenamento industrial; Acessórios de armazenamento industrial; Carros e carrinhos de limpeza; Forças de segurança; Fabrico; Manuseamento de material; Médico; Exploração mineira e de pedras; Piercing e tatuagens; Retalho; Ciência e laboratório; Sinalização; Equipamento de proteção de segurança no trabalho
sv: Företag och industri: Annonsering och marknadsföring; Jordbruk; Delar för automatiseringsstyrning; Konstruktion; Tandläkararbete; Film och TV; Finans och försäkring; Livsmedelsservice; Skogsbruk och skogsavverkning; Hårfrisering och kosmetik; Anläggningsmaskiner; Hotellverksamhet; Industrilager; Tillbehör för industriell förvaring; Städvagnar och -fordon; Ordningsmakt och säkerhet; Tillverkning; Materialhantering; Sjukvård; Gruvdrift och stenbrott; Piercing och tatuering; Detaljhandel; Vetenskap och laboratorium; Skyltar; Arbetsskyddskläder
it: Commercio e industria: Pubblicità e marketing; Agricoltura; Componenti di controllo dell'automazione; Costruzione; Odontoiatria; Cinema e televisione; Finanza e assicurazione; Ristorazione; Selvicoltura e tagli alberi; Parruccheria e cosmetologia; Macchinari pesanti; Alberghi e ospitalità; Stoccaggio industriale; Accessori per lo stoccaggio industriale; Carrelli e carretti per pulizie; Imposizione della legge; Produzione; Movimentazione di materiali; Medicina; Estrazione e cave; Piercing e tatuaggi; Negozi; Scienza e laboratorio; Segnaletica; Attrezzature protettive